Wyoming, session 2025, SF0024.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-2-216(a), 31-2-217(a),
31-2-218(a), 31-2-219(a), 31-2-220(a), 31-2-229(a),
31-2-230(a) and (b), 31-2-231(a) and 31-2-233(a) are
amended to read:

31-2-216. Special plates; former prisoners of war.

SF0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0268
(a) The county treasurer shall issue one (1) set of
special license plates for either a passenger car, truck,
motorcycle, handicapped motorcycle, multipurpose vehicle or
motor home owned or leased by a former prisoner of war in
accordance with this section for the year 1988 and
thereafter.

31-2-217. Special plates; Pearl Harbor survivors;
national guard members; armed forces veterans; purple heart
recipients; women armed forces veteran decals.

(a) The county treasurer shall issue one (1) set of
special license plates to each applicant for either a
passenger car, truck, motorcycle, handicapped motorcycle,
multipurpose vehicle or motor home owned or leased by a
survivor of Pearl Harbor, a member of the Wyoming army or
air national guard, a purple heart recipient or honorably
discharged veteran of the United States armed forces and,
if applied for and eligible, one (1) set of decals
designating the person is an honorably discharged woman
veteran of the United States armed forces in accordance
with this section. These license plates shall be displayed
upon the vehicle for which they are issued. A decal
SF0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0268
designating the person is an honorably discharged woman
veteran shall be attached in the lower left corner of a
license plate issued under this section.

31-2-218. Firefighter's license plates.

(a) A firefighter employed by a city, county, state
or duly created fire protection district, a volunteer
firefighter as defined by W.S. 35-9-616(a)(x) or a
firefighter retired from his department with at least ten
(10) years of service may apply for distinctive license
plates for any motor vehicle that is not a commercial
vehicle or multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by him upon
registration of the vehicle. If the firefighter became a
member of a bona fide fire department after January 1,
1995, he shall have a minimum of one (1) year service with
the fire department and be firefighter one certified or
engine boss wildfire certified in order to apply for the
license plate. The fire chief or his designated assistant
shall sign a written statement that the applicant is
eligible to obtain the license plate. A written statement
of eligibility for a retired firefighter shall be signed
only by the fire chief. License plates issued under this
SF0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0268
section shall be displayed upon the vehicle for which they
are issued. The license plates shall bear a distinctive
symbol and letters identifying the registrant as a
firefighter.

31-2-219. University of Wyoming license plates.

(a) Any person required to register a vehicle in
Wyoming pursuant to this article may apply to the
University of Wyoming for a statement of eligibility for
distinctive University of Wyoming license plates for any
motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or
multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by the applicant upon
registration of the vehicle. Upon payment by the applicant
of a fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) established and
assessed by the University of Wyoming, the university shall
issue a written statement of eligibility for University of
Wyoming license plates. Application shall be made at least
thirty (30) days before registration of the vehicle
expires. Any fees collected under this section shall be
payable to the University of Wyoming, shall be deposited in
a separate account and are continuously appropriated for
use as provided in W.S. 21-17-118. The fee authorized
SF0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0268
under this section may be increased annually up to the
percentage increase as shown by the Wyoming cost-of-living
index as determined by the division of economic analysis of
the department of administration and information.

31-2-220. Emergency medical technician's license
plates.

(a) Any person certified by the department of health
as an emergency medical technician may apply for
distinctive license plates for any motor vehicle that is
not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle owned or
leased by that person upon registration of the vehicle.
These license plates shall be displayed upon the vehicle
for which they are issued. The license plates shall bear a
distinctive symbol and letters identifying the registrant
as an emergency medical technician.

31-2-229. Special plates; gold star.

(a) Any person required to register a vehicle in
Wyoming pursuant to this article may apply to the Wyoming
veteran's commission for a statement of eligibility for
SF0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0268
distinctive gold star license plates for any motor vehicle
that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle
owned or leased by that person upon registration of the
vehicle. Upon payment of the fee required in W.S.
31-3-102(a)(viii) by the department, the Wyoming veteran's
commission shall issue a written statement of eligibility
for the gold star plate. Only parents, grandparents,
spouses, children or siblings of a member of the United
States armed forces who died while in service or who died
as a result of the service shall be eligible to receive the
gold star plates. Application shall be made at least
thirty (30) days before registration of the vehicle
expires.

31-2-230. Tribal license plates.

(a) Any person required to register a vehicle in
Wyoming pursuant to this article may apply for distinctive
Eastern Shoshone Indian tribe license plates for any motor
vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose
vehicle owned or leased by the applicant upon registration
of the vehicle. The department, in consultation with the
business council of the Eastern Shoshone Indian tribe,
SF0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0268
shall prescribe the design of the Eastern Shoshone license
plate, which shall include an image of the bucking horse
and rider as described in W.S. 8-3-117, and need not
include Arabic numerals for the county. The design of the
plate shall comply with any applicable federal or state
law.

(b) Any person required to register a vehicle in
Wyoming pursuant to this article may apply for distinctive
Northern Arapaho Indian tribe license plates for any motor
vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose
vehicle owned or leased by the applicant upon registration
of the vehicle. The department, in consultation with the
business council of the Northern Arapaho Indian tribe,
shall prescribe the design of the Northern Arapaho license
plate, which shall include an image of the bucking horse
and rider as described in W.S. 8-3-117, and need not
include Arabic numerals for the county. The design of the
plate shall comply with any applicable federal or state
law.

SF0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0268
31-2-231. Wildlife conservation license plates;
wildlife conservation account; authority to receive and
expend monies.

(a) Any person required to register a vehicle in
Wyoming pursuant to this article may apply to the
department for a statement of eligibility for wildlife
conservation license plates for any motor vehicle that is
not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle owned or
leased by that person upon registration of the vehicle.
The department may include as part of the application the
option for the applicant to donate an additional amount in
support of wildlife conservation efforts related to the
transportation system. Upon payment by the applicant of a
fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) to the
department, plus any additional voluntary amount, the
department shall issue a written statement of eligibility
for wildlife conservation license plates. The department
shall assess an annual fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for a
person to retain eligibility for wildlife conservation
plates, but this annual fee shall not be charged in the
year the person pays the one hundred fifty dollars
($150.00) eligibility fee. The person may submit an
SF0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0268
additional voluntary amount in support of wildlife
conservation efforts related to the transportation system
when remitting the annual fee.

31-2-233. Organ, eye and tissue donation license
plates.

(a) Any person interested in increasing awareness of
organ, eye and tissue donation and transplantation may
apply for and be issued distinctive license plates for any
motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or
multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by that person upon
registration of the vehicle. These license plates shall be
displayed upon the vehicle for which they are issued.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0024